Washington statutes.
RCW 43.08.030

Seal.

The treasurer shall keep a seal of office for the authentication of all papers, writings, and documents required to be certified by him or her.

[ 2009 c 549 s 5033; 1965 c 8 s 43.08.030. Prior: 1890 p 643 s 6; RRS s 11025; prior: 1886 p 135 s 6; 1871 p 78 s 6; 1864 p 53 s 7; 1854 p 414 s 7.]